Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-1205
District court; hearing; order; appeal.

The district court shall hear the appeal under sections 15-1201 to 15-1205 as in equity and without a jury and determine anew all questions raised before the city. The court may reverse or affirm, wholly or partly, or may modify the order or decision brought up for review. Either party may appeal from the decision of the district court to the Court of Appeals.

Laws 1969, c. 65, § 5, p. 378;

Laws 1991, LB 732, § 19;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 167.

This section does not limit review to illegality, but provides that appeals from various organs of a city of the primary class shall be considered as in equity. Thus, such decisions are quasi-judicial in nature and reviewable under section 15-1201 as in equity in both the trial and appellate courts. Moulton v. Board of Zoning Appeals, 251 Neb. 95, 555 N.W.2d 39 (1996).

On appeal from an order of the municipal human rights commission, the district court found the evidence insufficient to establish any unlawful employment discrimination by the employer. American Stores v. Jordan, 213 Neb. 213, 328 N.W.2d 756 (1982).